Rhode Island statutes. Title 7 Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Chapter 12.1 Uniform Partnership Act [Effective January 1, 2023.]
7-12.1-1005.
Activities not constituting doing business. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

Activities of a foreign limited liability partnership which do not constitute doing business in this state under this article include:

Maintaining, defending, mediating, arbitrating, or settling an action or proceeding;

Carrying on any activity concerning its internal affairs, including holding meetings of its partners;

Maintaining accounts in financial institutions;

Maintaining offices or agencies for the transfer, exchange, and registration of securities of the partnership or maintaining trustees or depositories with respect to those securities;

Selling through independent contractors;

Soliciting or obtaining orders by any means if the orders require acceptance outside this state before they become contracts;

Creating or acquiring indebtedness, mortgages, or security interests in property;

Securing or collecting debts or enforcing mortgages or security interests in property securing the debts and holding, protecting, or maintaining property;

Conducting an isolated transaction that is not in the course of similar transactions;

Owning, without more, property; and

Doing business in interstate commerce.

A person does not do business in this state solely by being a partner of a foreign limited liability partnership that does business in this state.

This section does not apply in determining the contacts or activities that may subject a foreign limited liability partnership to service of process, taxation, or regulation under law of this state other than this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-1006.
Noncomplying name of foreign limited liability partnership. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A foreign limited liability partnership whose name does not comply with §

7-12.1-902

may not register to do business in this state until it adopts, for the purpose of doing business in this state, an alternate name that complies with §

7-12.1-902

. A partnership that registers under an alternate name under this subsection need not comply with § 7-16-902 or

7-1.2-402

. A partnership that registers under an alternate name under this subsection need not comply with this state’s fictitious name statute. After registering to do business in the state with an alternate name, a partnership shall do business in this state under:

The alternate name;

The partnership’s name, with the addition of its jurisdiction of formation; or

A name the partnership is authorized to use under the state’s fictitious name statute to include, but not be limited to, § 7-16-902.1 or

7-1.2-402

.

If a registered foreign limited liability partnership changes its name to one that does not comply with §

7-12.1-902

, it may not do business in this state until it complies with subsection (a) of this section by amending its registration to adopt an alternate name that complies with §

7-12.1-902

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-1007.
Withdrawal deemed on conversion to domestic filing entity or domestic limited liability partnership. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A registered foreign limited liability partnership that converts to a domestic limited liability partnership or to a domestic entity whose formation requires the delivery of a record to the secretary of state for filing is deemed to have withdrawn its registration on the effective date of the conversion.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-1008.
Withdrawal on dissolution or conversion to nonfiling entity other than limited liability partnership. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A registered foreign limited liability partnership that has dissolved and completed winding up or has converted to a domestic or foreign entity whose formation does not require the public filing of a record, other than a limited liability partnership, shall deliver a statement of withdrawal to the secretary of state for filing. The statement must state:

In the case of a partnership that has completed winding up:

Its name and jurisdiction of formation;

That the partnership surrenders its registration to do business in this state;

That the limited liability partnership revokes the authority of its registered agent in this state to accept service of process and consents that service of process in any action, suit, or proceeding based upon any cause of action arising in this state during the time the limited liability partnership was authorized to transact business in this state may subsequently be made on the limited liability partnership by service on the secretary of state in accordance with subsection (b) of this section; and

The post office address to which the secretary of state may mail a copy of any process against the limited liability partnerships that is served on the secretary of state.

In the case of a partnership that has converted:

The name of the converting partnership and its jurisdiction of formation;

The type of entity to which the partnership has converted and its jurisdiction of formation;

That the converted entity surrenders the converting partnership’s registration to do business in this state and revokes the authority of the converting partnership’s registered agent to act as registered agent in this state on behalf of the partnership or the converted entity; and

A mailing address to which service of process may be made under subsection (b) of this section.

After a withdrawal under this section becomes effective, service of process in any action or proceeding based on a cause of action arising during the time the foreign limited liability partnership was registered to do business in this state may be made pursuant to §

7-12.1-912

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-1009.
Transfer of registration. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

When a registered foreign limited liability partnership has merged into a foreign entity that is not registered to do business in this state or has converted to a foreign entity required to register with the secretary of state to do business in this state, the foreign entity shall deliver to the secretary of state for filing an application for transfer of registration. The application must state:

The name of the registered foreign limited liability partnership before the merger or conversion;

That before the merger or conversion the registration pertained to a foreign limited liability partnership;

The name of the applicant foreign entity into which the foreign limited liability partnership has merged or to which it has been converted and, if the name does not comply with §

7-12.1-902

, an alternate name adopted pursuant to §

7-12.1-1006(a)

;

The type of entity of the applicant foreign entity and its jurisdiction of formation;

An application for authority to transact business in the state of Rhode Island for the resulting entity type and a certificate of legal existence or good standing issued by the proper officer of the state or country under the laws of which the resulting entity has been formed.

When an application for transfer of registration takes effect, the registration of the foreign limited liability limited partnership to do business in this state is transferred without interruption to the foreign entity into which the partnership has merged or to which it has been converted.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-1010.
Revocation of registration. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

The registration of a foreign limited liability partnership may be revoked by the secretary of state under the conditions prescribed in this section when it is established that:

The limited liability partnership procured its certificate of registration through fraud;

The limited liability partnership has continued to exceed or abuse the authority conferred upon it by law;

The limited liability partnership has failed to file its annual report within the time required by this chapter;

The limited liability partnership has failed to pay any required fees to the secretary of state when they have become due and payable;

The limited liability partnership has failed for thirty (30) days to appoint and maintain a registered agent in this state as required by this chapter;

The limited liability partnership has failed, after change of its registered agent, to file in the office of the secretary of state a statement of the change as required by this chapter;

The limited liability partnership has failed to file in the office of the secretary of state any amendment to its certificate of registration or any articles of dissolution, merger, or consolidation as prescribed by this chapter; or

A misrepresentation has been made of any material matter in any application, report, affidavit, or other document submitted by the limited liability partnership pursuant to this chapter.

No certificate of registration of a limited liability partnership shall be revoked by the secretary of state unless:

The secretary of state shall have given the limited liability partnership notice thereof not less than sixty (60) days prior to such revocation by regular mail addressed to the registered agent in this state on file with the secretary of state’s office, which notice shall specify the basis for the revocation; provided, however, that if a prior mailing addressed to the address of the registered agent of the limited liability partnership in this state currently on file with the secretary of state’s office has been returned as undeliverable by the United States Postal Service for any reason, or if the revocation notice is returned as undeliverable by the United States Postal Service for any reason, the secretary of state shall give notice as follows:

To the limited liability partnership at its principal office of record as shown in its most recent annual report, and no further notice shall be required; or

In the case of a limited liability partnership that has not yet filed an annual report, then to the limited liability partnership at the principal office in the certificate of registration of limited liability partnership and no further notice shall be required; and

The limited liability partnership fails prior to revocation to file the annual report, pay the fees or taxes, file the required statement of change of registered agent, file the amendment to its registration or certificate of withdrawal of registration, merger, or consolidation, or correct the misrepresentation.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-1011.
Issuance of certificates of revocation. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

Upon revoking any such certificate of registration of limited liability partnership, the secretary of state shall:

Issue a certificate of revocation in duplicate;

File one of the certificates in the secretary of state’s office;

Send to the limited liability partnership by regular mail a certificate of revocation, addressed to the registered agent of the limited liability partnership in this state on file with the secretary of state’s office; provided, however, that if a prior mailing addressed to the address of the registered agent of the limited liability partnership in this state currently on file with the secretary of state’s office has been returned to the secretary of state as undeliverable by the United States Postal Service for any reason, or if the revocation certificate is returned as undeliverable to the secretary of state’s office by the United States Postal Service for any reason, the secretary of state shall give notice as follows:

To the limited liability partnership at its principal office of record as shown in its most recent annual report, and no further notice shall be required; or

In the case of a limited liability partnership that has not yet filed an annual report, then to the principal office listed in the certificate of registration, and no further notice shall be required.

The authority of the registered foreign limited liability partnership to do business in this state ceases on the effective date of the certificate of revocation, or to apply for reinstatement under §

7-12.1-1012

.

The revocation of a limited liability partnership does not terminate the authority of its registered agent.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-1012.
Reinstatement. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

Within two (2) years after issuing a certificate of revocation as provided in §

7-12.1-1011

, the secretary of state may withdraw the certificate of revocation and retroactively reinstate the limited liability partnership in good standing as if its certificate of registration of limited liability partnership had not been revoked except as subsequently provided:

On the filing by the limited liability partnership of the documents it had previously failed to file as set forth in §§

7-12.1-1006(a)(3)

through 7-12.1-1006(a)(7).

On the payment by the limited liability partnership of a penalty in the amount of fifty dollars ($50.00) for each year or part of year that has elapsed since the issuance of the certificate of revocation.

If, as permitted by the provisions of this chapter or chapter 1.2, 6, 12, or 13.1 of this title, another limited liability company, business or nonprofit corporation, registered limited liability partnership or a limited liability partnership, or in each case domestic or foreign, authorized and qualified to transact business in this state, bears or has filed a fictitious business name statement as to or reserved or registered a name that is the same as, the name of the limited liability partnership with respect to which the certificate of revocation is proposed to be withdrawn, then the secretary of state shall condition the withdrawal of the certificate of revocation on the reinstated limited liability partnership amending its certificate of registration so as to designate a name that meets the requirements of §

7-12.1-902

by adopting an alternate name pursuant to §

7-12.1-1006(a)

.

When reinstatement under this section has become effective, the following rules apply:

The reinstatement relates back to and takes effect as of the effective date of the certificate of revocation.

The limited liability partnership resumes carrying on its activities and affairs as if the revocation had not occurred.

The rights of a person arising out of an act or omission in reliance on the revocation before the person knew or had notice of the reinstatement are not affected.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-1013.
Withdrawal of registration of registered foreign limited liability partnership. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A registered foreign limited liability partnership may withdraw its registration by delivering a statement of withdrawal to the secretary of state for filing. The statement of withdrawal must state:

The name of the partnership and its jurisdiction of formation;

That the partnership is not doing business in this state and that it withdraws its registration to do business in this state;

That the limited liability partnership revokes the authority of its registered agent in this state to accept service of process and consents that service of process in any action, suit, or proceeding based upon any cause of action arising in this state during the time the limited liability partnership was authorized to transact business in this state may subsequently be made on the limited partnership by service on the secretary of state in accordance with subsection (b) of this section; and

The post office address to which the secretary of state may mail a copy of any process against the limited liability partnership that is served on the secretary of state.

After the withdrawal of the registration of a foreign limited liability partnership, service of process in any action or proceeding based on a cause of action arising during the time the partnership was registered to do business in this state may be made pursuant to §

7-12.1-912

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-1014.
Action by attorney general. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

The attorney general may maintain an action to enjoin a foreign limited liability partnership from doing business in this state in violation of this article of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.